Maryland, session 2025, SB0785.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Labor and Employment
3–1201.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) (1) “Eligible employee” means an individual who has requested that an
employer provide parental leave and who, as of the date that the requested parental leave
begins, will have been employed by that employer for at least:
(i) a 12–month period; and
(ii) 1,250 hours during the previous 12 months.
(2) “Eligible employee” does not include an individual:
(i) who is employed at a work site at which the employer employs
fewer than 15 employees if the total number of employees employed by that employer
within 75 miles of the work site is also fewer than 15; or
– 1 –

Ch. 296 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) who is an independent contractor.
(c) (1) “Employer” means a person who:
(I) employs at least 15 but not more than 49 individuals in the State
for each working day during each of 20 or more calendar workweeks in the current or
preceding calendar year; AND
(II) IS NOT COVERED UNDER THE FEDERAL FAMILY AND
MEDICAL LEAVE ACT FOR THE CURRENT CALENDAR YEAR.
(2) “Employer” includes:
(i) a person who acts, directly or indirectly, in the interest of an
employer with respect to an employee of the employer; and
(ii) a successor in interest of an employer.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 2 –